Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1215
Intent and purpose.

The intent and purpose of the Relocation Assistance Act is to establish uniform policies and procedures for the fair and equitable treatment of persons displaced as a result of publicly financed projects in order that such persons will not suffer disproportionate injuries as a result of projects designed for the benefit of the public as a whole.

Laws 1989, LB 254, § 2.